port-foma/port.foma
read lexc port.lexc
define Lexicon;

define IWeighted i -> í || _ "^" [a m o s] .#. ;
define AWeighted a -> á || _ "^" [v a m o s] .#. ;
define APreterite1PL a -> á || _ "^" [m o s] .#. ;
define APreterite3SG a -> o || _ "^" [u] .#. ;
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o. IWeighted .o. AWeighted .o. APreterite1PL .o. APreterite3SG .o. Cleanup ;
